morphophonology/foma/pcsuff6.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @D.S_OBJ_MARKS@ @R.S_OBJ_MARKS@

LEXICON Root
-b:əb   #; !"passive"
-sut    #; !"reflexive"
-but    #; !"reflexive"
-agʷəl  #; !"rcp"

!s series obj-markers
@R.S_OBJ_MARKS@-s      #; !1sg obj
@R.S_OBJ_MARKS@-sid    #; !2sg obj
@R.S_OBJ_MARKS@-ubuɬ   #; !1pl obj
@R.S_OBJ_MARKS@-ubuɬəd #; !2pl obj

!b series obj-markers
@D.S_OBJ_MARKS@-bš     #; !1sg obj
@D.S_OBJ_MARKS@-bicid  #; !2sg obj
@D.S_OBJ_MARKS@-buɬ    #; !1pl obj
@D.S_OBJ_MARKS@-buɬəd  #; !2pl obj
